Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.015

Registering a security in beneficiary form—Authorization.

A registering entity may register a security in beneficiary form if the form is authorized by this chapter or a substantially identical statute of another state if the state is: (1) The state of organization of the issuer or registering entity, (2) the location of the registering entity's principal office, (3) the location of the office of its transfer agent or its office making the registration, or (4) the location of the owner's listed address at the time of registration. A registration governed by the law of a jurisdiction in which this or substantially identical legislation is not in force or was not in force when a registration in beneficiary form was made is nevertheless presumed to be valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.

[ 1993 c 287 s 3.]